Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 7 Foundation Level School Support [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-7-44.
School housing project costs.

School housing project costs, the date of completion of school housing projects, and the applicable amount of school housing project cost commitments shall be in accordance with the regulations of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and the provisions of §§

16-7-35

—

16-7-47

; provided, however, that school housing project costs shall include the purchase of sites, buildings, and equipment, the construction of buildings, and additions or renovations of existing buildings and/or facilities. School housing project costs shall include the cost of interest payment on any bond issued after July 1, 1988, provided that such bond is approved by the voters on or before June 30, 2003, or issued by a municipal public building authority or by the appropriate approving authority on or before June 30, 2003. Except as provided in §

16-7-41(d)

, for those projects approved after June 30, 2003, interest payments may only be included in project costs provided that the bonds for these projects are issued through the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation. School housing project costs shall exclude: (1) Any bond issuance costs incurred by the municipality or regional school district; (2) Demolition costs for buildings, facilities, or sites deemed surplus by the school committee; and (3) Restrictions pursuant to §

16-7-44.1

. A building, facility, or site is declared surplus by a school committee when the committee no longer has such building, facility, or site under its direct care and control and transfers control to the municipality, §

16-2-15

. The council on elementary and secondary education will promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this section. These rules and regulations may provide for the use of lease revenue bonds, capital leases, or capital reserve funding, to finance school housing provided that the term of any bond, or capital lease shall not be longer than the useful life of the project and these instruments are subject to the public review and voter approval otherwise required by law for the issuance of bonds or capital leases. Cities or towns issuing bonds, or leases issued by a municipal public buildings authority for the benefit of a local community pursuant to chapter 50 of title 45 shall not require voter approval. Effective January 1, 2008, and except for interim finance mechanisms, refunding bonds, borrowing from the school building authority capital fund, and bonds issued by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation to finance school housing projects for towns, cities, or regional school districts borrowing for which has previously been authorized by an enabling act of the general assembly, all bonds, notes, and other forms of indebtedness issued in support of school housing projects shall require passage of an enabling act by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 10; P.L. 1981, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2007, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 1.

16-7-44.1.
Program restrictions.

Housing aid shall not be provided for the purchase of furniture, fixtures and equipment except in the case of a project to construct a new school or new school addition that is also supported by a general obligation or lease revenue bond. Housing aid shall not be provided for projects supported by capital lease agreements that: (1) are not lease purchase agreements; (2) do not demonstrate a direct benefit to the school nor are located on school property; and (3) do not exclude all non-capital costs such as maintenance costs prior to the request for reimbursement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 6.

16-7-44.2.
Repayment of school housing aid.

If an audit or subsequent review by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education determines that a community was overpaid school housing aid, the community shall repay the determined amount over a number of years that is calculated by dividing the total amount of the overpayment by the total amount of revenues reported by the school district for the most recently completed fiscal year.

If the percentage derived from section (a) above is one-half percent (0.5%) or less, the community shall repay the entire amount of the overpayment in the same fiscal year in which the overpayment is determined.

If the percentage derived from section (a) above is greater than one-half percent (0.5%), the community shall repay the amount of the overpayment over a number of years that equals the percentage derived from section (a) divided by one-half percent (0.5%).

Repayments of more than one year shall be made in equal installments over the term derived from section (c) above. The department of elementary and secondary education will submit an invoice to the community on July 1st.

If the department of elementary and secondary education has not received the required amount by June 30 of the applicable fiscal year, education aid for the community calculated pursuant to §

16-7.1-15

shall be reduced by the amount due.

If the entire overpayment is not received in full in the first year, interest will be applied annually at a rate equal to the consumer price index.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 13, § 2.

16-7-45.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate those sums that it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of §§

16-7-35

to

16-7-47

, and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of it as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers. In the event that the full amount of housing aid has not been appropriated in a particular fiscal year, school housing aid will not be ratably reduced. In such cases, aid computed for school housing costs for debt service which has been paid by the local community prior to project completion will be deferred. Such aid will be paid within three (3) equal installments beginning the fiscal year after project completion. This deferral provision shall only be applicable if the computed aid for debt service paid by the local community prior to project completion exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 11; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 13, § 3.

16-7-46.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 13; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 288, § 1, effective June 30, 1987. For present provision of law, see §

16-7-33

.

16-7-47.
Addition to existing aid.

The provisions of §§

16-7-35

to

16-7-47

shall be in addition to any and all state aid for education as provided in any other general or special law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 26, § 14.

16-7-48, 16-7-49.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 77, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 1994.